Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,229
Tort claims; remedy of State Tort Claims Act; exclusive.

From and after December 25, 1969, the authority of any state agency to sue or be sued in its own name shall not be construed to authorize suits against such state agency on tort claims except as authorized in the State Tort Claims Act. The remedies provided by such act for tort claims and suits against the state and employees of the state shall be exclusive.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 21, p. 2852;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 40;

Laws 1989, LB 541, § 6.